New Jersey, session 222, S3854.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In the event that a state of emergency is declared due to the failure to enact a general appropriation law by the deadline prescribed by Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 2 of the New Jersey Constitution, the operation of all State parks and forests and State-owned beaches shall continue and all such locations shall be open to the public.  During this period, the State shall not charge or collect fees for parking at State parking areas serving State parks and forests and State-owned beaches.  All State employees that have been designated as necessary to provide for the government services at each State park and forest and State-owned beach area shall be considered essential personnel. 2.    In the event that a state of emergency is declared due to the failure to enact a general appropriation law by the deadline prescribed by Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 2 of the New Jersey Constitution, the operation of all New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission agencies, regional service centers, and inspection facilities, and the offices of any other State agency that directly support the operation of New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission agencies, regional service centers, or inspection facilities, shall continue and all such locations shall be open to the public.  All State employees or contracted employees that have been designated as necessary to provide for the government services at each New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission agency, regional service center, inspection facility, or supporting agency office shall be considered essential personnel. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.